Utah statutes.
13-26-3.   Registration and bond required.

(1) (a)  Unless exempt under Section 13-26-4, each telephone soliciting business shall register annually with the division before engaging in telephone solicitations if:

(i)  the telephone soliciting business engages in telephone solicitations that:

(A)  originate in Utah; or

(B)  are received in Utah; or

(ii)  the telephone soliciting business conducts any business operations in Utah.

(b)  The registration form shall designate an agent residing in this state who is authorized by the telephone soliciting business to receive service of process in any action brought by this state or a resident of this state.

(c)  If a telephone soliciting business fails to designate an agent to receive service or fails to appoint a successor to the agent:

(i)  the business' application for an initial or renewal registration shall be denied; and

(ii)  any current registration shall be suspended until an agent is designated.

(2)  The division may impose an annual registration fee set pursuant to Section 63J-1-504.

(3) (a)  Each telephone soliciting business engaging in telephone solicitation or sales in this state shall obtain and maintain the following security:

(i)  a performance bond issued by a surety authorized to transact surety business in this state;

(ii)  an irrevocable letter of credit  issued by a financial institution authorized to do business in this state; or

(iii)  a certificate of deposit  held in this state in a depository institution regulated by the Department of Financial Institutions.

(b)  The bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit shall be payable to the division for the benefit of any consumer who incurs damages as the result of any telephone solicitation or sales violation of this chapter.

(c)  The division may recover from the bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit investigative costs, attorney fees, and other costs of collecting and distributing funds under this section and the costs of promoting consumer education, but only if the consumer has first recovered full damages.

(d)  A telephone soliciting business shall keep a bond, certificate of deposit, or letter of credit in force for one year after it notifies the division in writing that it has ceased all activities regulated by this chapter.

(e)  The amount to be posted in the form of a bond, irrevocable letter of credit, or certificate of deposit shall be:

(i)  $25,000 if:

(A)  neither the telephone soliciting business nor any affiliated person has violated this chapter within three years preceding the date of the application; and

(B)  the telephone soliciting business has fewer than 10 employees;

(ii)  $50,000 if:

(A)  neither the telephone soliciting business nor any affiliated person has violated this chapter within three years preceding the date of the application; and

(B)  the telephone soliciting business has 10 or more employees; or

(iii)  $75,000 if the telephone soliciting business or any affiliated person has violated this chapter within three years preceding the date of the application.

(f)  For purposes of Subsection (3)(e) an "affiliated person" means a contractor, director, employee, officer, owner, or partner of the telephone soliciting business.

(4)  The division may establish by rule the registration requirements for telephone soliciting businesses under the terms of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.  An administrative proceeding conducted by the division under this chapter shall comply with the requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(5)  The division director may revoke a registration under this section for any violation of this chapter.

